Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and sections 2 through 12 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain.(2) "Autonomous motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system designed to function as a level three system when the automated driving system is engaged, four system, or five system under the society of automotive engineers international standard J3016, as it existed on the effective date of this section.(3) "Dynamic driving task" means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic, excluding the strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints, and including:(a) Lateral vehicle motion control via steering;(b) Longitudinal motion control via acceleration and deceleration;(c) Monitoring the driving environment via object and event detection, recognition, classification, and response preparation;(d) Object and event response execution;(e) Maneuver planning; and(f) Enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and gesturing.(4) "Dynamic driving task fallback" means the response by the person or human driver to either perform the dynamic driving task or achieve a minimal risk condition after the occurrence of any dynamic driving task performance-relevant system failure or upon operational design domain exit, or the response by an automated driving system to achieve minimal risk condition, given the same circumstances.(5) "Human driver" means a natural person in the vehicle with a valid driver's license to operate a motor vehicle who controls all or part of the dynamic driving task.(6) "Minimal risk condition" means a stable, stopped condition to which a person, human driver, or an automated driving system may bring a vehicle after performing the dynamic driving task fallback in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should not be completed.(7) "On-demand autonomous vehicle network" means a transportation service network that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch or otherwise enable the prearrangement of transportation with autonomous motor vehicles for purposes of transporting passengers or goods, including for-hire transportation and transportation of passengers or goods for compensation.(8) "Operational design domain" means operating conditions under which a given automated driving system is specifically designed to function including, but not limited to, environmental, geographical, and time-of-day restrictions, or the requisite presence or absence of certain traffic or roadway characteristics.(9) "Person" means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, governmental agency, public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.(10) "Request to intervene" means an alert or notification by an automated driving system to a human driver, that the human driver should promptly begin or resume performance of part or all of the dynamic driving task.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) A person may operate an autonomous motor vehicle on the public roadways of this state when the automated driving system is engaged only if such vehicle meets the following conditions:(a) If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders that system unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to its intended operational design domain, the autonomous motor vehicle achieves a minimal risk condition or, if the failure occurs in a vehicle with an automated driving system that is a level three system under the society of automotive engineers international standard J3016, as it existed on the effective date of this section, the automated driving system must issue a request to intervene;(b) The autonomous motor vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and rules under this title when reasonable to do so, unless an exemption has been granted by the department;(c) When required by federal law, the autonomous motor vehicle displays the required manufacturer's certification label indicating that at the time of its manufacture it has been certified to be in compliance with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards, including reference to any exemption granted by the national highway traffic safety administration; and(d) The autonomous motor vehicle is covered by liability insurance under section 4 of this act.(2)(a) In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a person may operate an autonomous motor vehicle on the public roadways of this state when the automated driving system is engaged if:(i) The person receives and maintains an authorization to operate the autonomous motor vehicle from the department under (b) of this subsection; and(ii) The department has been provided with a first responder action plan. For purposes of this subsection, a "first responder action plan" is a document specifying how first responders should interact with an autonomous motor vehicle that, at a minimum, describes:(A) How to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during the times the autonomous motor vehicle is in operation;(B) How to safely remove the autonomous motor vehicle from the roadway and steps to safely tow the vehicle;(C) How to recognize whether the autonomous motor vehicle is in autonomous mode; and(D) Any additional information the person submitting the plan, the manufacturer of the autonomous motor vehicle, or the manufacturer of the automated driving system deems necessary regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the operation of the autonomous motor vehicle.(b) To receive an authorization to operate an autonomous motor vehicle under (a) of this subsection, a person must provide the following to the department:(i) The name, address, and principal point of contact for the person applying for the authorization;(ii) Vehicle information for each autonomous motor vehicle used for operations in the state, such as tag number and state of issuance, vehicle information number, vehicle make, model, and year, and proof of current vehicle registration; and(iii) A written statement by the person applying for the authorization or by the manufacturer of the vehicle or automated driving system certifying that each autonomous motor vehicle complies with subsection (1) of this section.(c) Upon receipt of an application under (b) of this subsection and verifying that the application is complete and accurate, the department must approve the application and issue an authorization.(3) An authorization issued by the department under this section does not expire and remains active unless suspended, revoked, or canceled by the department as described under section 12 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:When an automated driving system installed on an autonomous motor vehicle is engaged:(1) The automated driving system is considered the driver or operator, for the purpose of assessing compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws under this title, and is deemed to satisfy electronically all physical acts required by a driver or operator of the vehicle;(2) The automated driving system is considered to be licensed to drive under chapter 46.20 RCW to operate the vehicle; and(3) The automated driving system operator or human driver may be issued a traffic infraction or other applicable penalty if the vehicle fails to comply with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws under this title.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:Before operating an autonomous motor vehicle on public roadways in this state without a human driver, a person must submit proof of financial responsibility satisfactory to the department that the autonomous motor vehicle is covered by liability insurance that satisfies the requirements of RCW 46.30.050.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) In the event of an accident or collision involving an autonomous motor vehicle:(a) The autonomous motor vehicle must remain on the scene of the accident or collision when required under RCW 46.52.020, consistent with its capability under section 2 of this act.(b) The autonomous motor vehicle's authorization holder, or a person on behalf of the authorization holder, must report the accident or collision consistent with RCW 46.52.030(1). Submission of a report under subsection (2) of this section is authorized in lieu of the requirement under this subsection (1)(b).(2) Copies of any national highway traffic safety administration standing general order collision reports for any reportable collision that occurs in Washington state must be provided to the department within one day of the provision to the national highway traffic safety administration, unless such reports are otherwise made available to the state pursuant to federal law.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) It is the intent of the legislature to provide uniformity of laws governing on-demand autonomous motor vehicle networks throughout the state, and that an on-demand autonomous motor vehicle network be considered a stand-alone service as solely regulated under this section.(2) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network may transport passengers or goods, including the for-hire transportation of passengers, including minors, or goods in the state pursuant to this section.(3)(a) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must disclose to the passenger the fare or fare calculator method on its website or within the online-enabled technology application service before the beginning of any prearranged ride.(b) Within a reasonable period after the completion of a ride, an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must transmit an electronic receipt to the passenger that lists:(i) The origin and destination of the ride;(ii) The total time and distance of the ride; and(iii) The total fare paid.(4)(a) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network is governed exclusively by state law, and by any local jurisdiction that enacted ordinances or created rules governing autonomous motor vehicles prior to the effective date of this section. A county, municipality, special purpose district, airport authority, or other local governmental entity or subdivision may not require a license or permit for, impose reporting requirements on, or otherwise impose operational restrictions on an on-demand autonomous vehicle network company within the entity's jurisdiction. (b) A county, municipality, special district, airport authority, or other local governmental entity or subdivision may only impose a tax on or subject an on-demand autonomous vehicle network company to a rate or fee within the entity's jurisdiction if the tax, rate, or fee is equivalent to those charged to transportation network companies in the entity's jurisdiction. (c) This subsection does not prohibit an airport or port authority from:(i) Charging reasonable fees consistent with any fees charged to companies that provide similar services within the airport or port authority for its use of the airport or port authority's facilities; or(ii) Designating locations for staging, pickup, or other similar operations at the airport or port authority facility; however, such designated locations must be reasonably equivalent to those required of other passenger transportation services.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:An autonomous motor vehicle must be properly registered in accordance with chapter 46.16A RCW, and identified on the certificate of title and registration as an autonomous motor vehicle.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) A person may operate an autonomous motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task if the automated driving system is capable of being operated in compliance with this title when reasonable to do so unless an exemption has been granted by the department.(2) This section does not prohibit or restrict a human driver from operating an autonomous motor vehicle equipped with controls that allow for the human driver to control all or part of the dynamic driving task.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:An autonomous motor vehicle that is also a commercial motor vehicle as defined in RCW 46.16A.010 may operate on the public roadways of this state, except that any provision under this title that reasonably applies only to a human driver does not apply to such a vehicle operating with the automated driving system engaged.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:An autonomous motor vehicle that is designed to be operated exclusively by the automated driving system for all trips is not subject to motor vehicle equipment laws or rules pursuant to chapter 46.37 RCW that: (1) Relate to or support motor vehicle operation by a human driver seated in the vehicle; and (2) are not relevant for an automated driving system.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:(1) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, autonomous motor vehicles and automated driving systems are governed exclusively under this chapter. The department is the sole and exclusive state agency that may implement the provisions of this chapter.(2) No state agency, political subdivision, municipality, or local entity may prohibit the operation of autonomous motor vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-demand autonomous vehicle networks, or otherwise enact or keep in force rules or ordinances that would impose taxes, fees, or other requirements, including performance standards, specific to the operation of autonomous motor vehicles, automated driving systems, or on-demand autonomous vehicle networks in addition to the requirements of this chapter.(3) This section does not limit or preempt the existing authority of a municipality or other local government to regulate, license, or tax transportation network companies, ride-hail services, or other for-hire passenger services utilizing nonautonomous motor vehicles, or to manage the use of public rights-of-way, consistent with state law.(4) This chapter does not exempt the in-state purchase of autonomous motor vehicles from the requirements of chapter 46.96 RCW, where such requirements apply to all motor vehicles.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. A new section is added to chapter 46.92 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) If the department determines that an autonomous motor vehicle operating under an authorization issued under section 2(2) of this act is not in safe operational condition and the operation of the vehicle on public roadways of the state endangers the public, the department must provide to the authorization holder a notice of intent to:(i) Suspend, revoke, or cancel the authorization; or(ii) Impose restrictions on the operation of the vehicle.(b) For purposes of (a) of this subsection, the operation of an autonomous motor vehicle endangers the public when the operation creates a substantial risk of death or has caused death, serious permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.(2) A notice of intent under subsection (1)(a) of this section must:(a) Include a summary of the department's determination and any evidence supporting the determination; and(b) Provide the authorization holder a reasonable period in which to:(i) Correct the issues identified in the department's determination;(ii) Provide to the department the certification described under subsection (3)(a) of this section; and(iii) Specify which enforcement actions described in subsection (1)(a) of this section the department will take if the authorization holder fails to provide the required certification within the specified period.(3)(a) Before the expiration of the period specified in a notice of intent under subsection (2)(b) of this section, the authorization holder must:(i) Ensure the issues identified by the department in the notice are corrected; and(ii) Provide to the department a certification acknowledging that the issues identified by the department in the notice have been corrected and explaining how the issues have been corrected, such as identifying operational measures implemented.(b) The department may extend the period specified in a notice of intent under subsection (2)(b) of this section if the authorization holder requests an extension in writing and the department determines the extension is reasonable.(4)(a) If the authorization holder fails to comply with subsection (3)(a) of this section, the department must issue a decision that:(i) Suspends, revokes, or cancels the authorization or imposes restrictions on the operation of the vehicle; and(ii) Promptly notify the authorization holder of the decision.(b) Within 10 days of receiving a notice of a decision issued under (a) of this subsection, an authorization holder may submit a written request to the department for review of the decision. Within 10 days of the department receiving such a request for review, the department must review the decision and issue a final determination to the authorization holder either upholding or rescinding the decision.(c) If the department upholds the decision under (b) of this subsection, an authorization holder may submit a written request for a hearing. Such a request must be submitted within 10 days of the department issuing a final determination. The department must set a hearing date within 10 days of the hearing request and provide the authorization holder, the manufacturer of the autonomous motor vehicle, and the manufacturer of the automated driving system the opportunity to present evidence at the hearing. The hearing must be conducted by an administrative law judge within the office of administrative hearings and be conducted within 30 days of the department issuing a final determination. If a hearing is not held within such time period, the authorization issued under section 2(2) of this act must be automatically reinstated or the restriction imposed automatically removed, as applicable.(5) The department must promptly rescind an authorization suspension, revocation, or cancellation or remove an imposed restriction on operation of the autonomous motor vehicle if the authorization holder satisfies the requirements under subsection (3)(a) of this section.Sec. 13. RCW 46.30.050 and 2020 c 182 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((No entity may test an autonomous motor vehicle on any public roadway under the department's autonomous vehicle self-certification testing pilot program unless:(a) The entity holds an umbrella))(a) A person operating an autonomous motor vehicle on any public road of this state without a human driver shall hold a liability insurance policy that covers the entity in an amount not less than ((five million dollars))$1,000,000 per occurrence for damages by reason of bodily injury or death or property damage, caused by the operation of an autonomous motor vehicle ((for which information is provided under the autonomous vehicle self-certification testing pilot program; and(b) The entity maintains)).(b) Financial responsibility requirements under (a) of this subsection may be satisfied by:(i) An insurance policy issued by an insurer licensed in Washington state; or(ii) An insurance policy issued by a licensed surplus line broker authorized under RCW 48.15.040.(c) No higher limits of insurance or additional coverages may be required solely due to a vehicle's use of an automated driving system other than the financial responsibility minimum requirements under this subsection (1).(2) A person operating an autonomous motor vehicle on public roads in this state without a human driver shall maintain proof of this policy with the department in a form and manner specified by the department.(((2)))(3) Requirements related to proof of motor vehicle insurance under RCW 46.30.020 and penalties for providing false evidence of motor vehicle insurance under RCW 46.30.040 are applicable to this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. RCW 46.92.010 (TestingâSelf-certification pilot programâInformation to be providedâUnique identification numberâNoticeâFeeâPublic accessâOperation) and 2021 c 193 s 1 & 2020 c 182 s 2 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 15. This act takes effect October 1, 2026.--- END ---